Wyoming, session 2025, HB0305.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-24-101 through 39-24-111 are
created to read:

CHAPTER 24
COUNTY OPTIONAL TAX ON PRODUCTION OF ELECTRICITY FROM SOLAR
RESOURCES

HB0305

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0755
39-24-101. Definitions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for definitions
for this chapter.

39-24-102. Administration.

A board of county commissioners may by resolution provide
for the implementation and administration of a tax on the
production of electricity from solar resources in the
county. The department shall promulgate any rules necessary
for the implementation and enforcement of this chapter.

39-24-103. Imposition.

A county may impose an excise tax upon the privilege of
producing electricity from solar resources in the county. A
tax under this chapter shall be imposed upon the production
of electricity produced from solar resources for sale or
trade, and shall be paid by the person producing such
electricity.

39-24-104. Taxation rate.
HB0305

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0755

The tax rate or fee shall be established by the resolution
of the board of county commissioners on the production of
electricity from solar resources in the county. No tax
imposed under this section shall exceed a rate of five
dollars ($5.00) on each megawatt hour or a rate of five
percent (5%) of the annual gross energy earnings from
energy produced in the county by solar resources, whichever
is greater.

39-24-105. Exemptions.

(a) No tax shall be imposed under this chapter upon
electricity that is produced from any generating facility
owned or operated by the federal government, the state of
Wyoming or by any county or municipality in this state.

(b) No tax shall be imposed under this chapter upon
electricity which is produced for the personal consumption
of the producer.

39-24-106. Licensing; permits.

HB0305

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0755
The county may establish by regulation provisions for
licenses and permits for this chapter.

39-24-107. Compliance; collection procedures.

(a) Returns and reports. Any person producing
electricity from solar resources within a county that has
imposed a tax under this chapter shall report as required
by the county.

(b) Payment. Any person owing a tax under this
chapter shall pay the tax or fee to the county treasurer as
required by the county imposing the tax.

(c) Timelines. There are no specific applicable
provisions for timelines for this chapter.

39-24-108. Enforcement.

(a) Audits. There are no specific applicable
provisions for audits for this chapter.

HB0305

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0755
(b) Interest. The county may establish by regulation
for the payment of interest for delinquent taxes.

(c) Penalties. The county may establish by
regulation provisions for the payment of penalties for
failure to comply with a tax imposed under this chapter.

(d) Liens. Any delinquent tax imposed under this
chapter is a lien upon the property of any producer from
and after the time the tax is due until the tax is paid.
The tax lien shall have preference over all liens except
any valid mortgage or other liens of record filed or
recorded prior to the date the tax became due.

(e) Tax sales. There are no specific applicable
provisions for tax sales for this chapter.

39-24-109. Taxpayer remedies.

There are no specific applicable provisions for taxpayer
remedies for this chapter.

39-24-110. Statute of limitations.
HB0305

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0755

There are no specific applicable provisions for a statute
of limitations for this chapter.

39-24-111. Distribution.

(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, the
proceeds from a tax imposed by this chapter shall be
distributed to the general fund of the county imposing the
tax.

(b) If any portion of the electricity on which a tax
is levied under this chapter is produced within the
municipal boundaries of a city or town, fifty percent (50%)
of the proceeds from the tax resulting from electricity
produced within the municipal boundaries of the city or
town shall be distributed by the county treasurer for
deposit in the general fund of the city or town.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0305